Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska75-305
Fees; amount; when due; disposition.

(1) Every regulated motor carrier subject to sections 75-301 to 75-322 other than transportation network companies shall pay an annual fee not exceeding the sum of eighty dollars for each motor vehicle operated, which fee shall be fixed by the commission and shall not exceed the amount actually necessary to sustain the administration and enforcement of such sections. When the applicant has registered his or her motor vehicles under section 60-3,198, such fee shall be payable on whichever shall be the lesser of (a) the proportion of his or her fleet so registered or (b) the number of motor vehicles owned by him or her and actually used in intrajurisdiction business within this state, except that such annual fee for any truck-trailer or tractor-trailer combination shall be one hundred twenty dollars. In the case of a truck-trailer or tractor-trailer combination, only one license plate shall be required for such combination.

(2) Every transportation network company shall pay an annual fee. The company may choose to pay either twenty-five thousand dollars or not to exceed eighty dollars for each personal vehicle operated by a driver of the transportation network company. The commission shall establish the amount per vehicle so that the amount collected does not exceed the amount actually necessary to sustain the administration and enforcement of laws, rules, and regulations governing transportation network companies.

(3) Such annual fees shall be due and payable on or before January 1 and shall be delinquent on March 1 of each year after such permit or certificate has been issued. If the initial certificate or permit is issued to a motor carrier on or after July 1, the fee shall be fifty percent of the annual fee. Such fees shall be paid to and collected by the commission and remitted to the State Treasurer within thirty days of receipt. The State Treasurer shall credit fees received pursuant to subsection (2) of this section to the Transportation Network Company Regulation Cash Fund for enforcement of laws, rules, and regulations governing transportation network companies. The State Treasurer shall credit fees received pursuant to subsection (1) of this section to the General Fund.

Laws 1963, c. 425, art. III, § 5, p. 1378;

Laws 1969, c. 606, § 4, p. 2470;

Laws 1982, LB 928, § 58;

Laws 1989, LB 78, § 21;

Laws 1993, LB 412, § 7;

Laws 1995, LB 424, § 28;

Laws 1996, LB 1218, § 46;

Laws 2003, LB 187, § 23;

Laws 2003, LB 563, § 40;

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 270;

Laws 2015, LB629, § 25.